Massachusetts, session 194th, S2582.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, all cafeteria
positions in the school department in the city of Taunton, including, but not limited to, senior
cook, cook, helper, cashier, satellite lunch room supervisor, head start cook/supervisor,
production manager and head cashier, shall be exempt from chapter 31 of the General Laws.
SECTION 2. The school department of the city of Taunton shall report on the hiring
procedures, including required level of experience, for cafeteria positions, including, but not
limited to, senior cook, cook, helper, cashier, satellite lunch room supervisor, head start
cook/supervisor, production manager and head cashier, in the city to the joint committee on
public service not more than 1 year from the effective date of this act.
of 2

SECTION 3. Section 1 shall apply to employees in the cafeteria positions subject to said
section 1 who were hired on July 1, 2019 and thereafter.
SECTION 4. Section 2 shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2